Wyoming, session 2026, SF0006.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 42-4-106 by creating a new subsection
(e) is amended to read:
42-4-106. Application for assistance; determination
of eligibility; assignment of benefits; resources and
income allowances defined for institutionalized spouse.
(e) The following requirements shall be met before an
applicant is eligible for medical assistance under this
chapter:
(i) An applicant shall be a citizen or national
of the United States and shall provide a valid social
security number and proof of identity. An applicant
considered to be lawfully present in the United States
shall be eligible for medical assistance under this
chapter. The requirement in this paragraph shall not apply
when determining if the department of health will cover
children in the custody of the department of family
services;
(ii) An applicant shall be a Wyoming resident or
meet the criteria specified in the Wyoming Medicaid state
plan. An applicant who intends to return to the applicant's
home in another state or country shall not be considered a
Wyoming resident;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0006
ENROLLED ACT NO. 12, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) An applicant shall fulfill not less than
one (1) of the following criteria:
(A) Be determined disabled according to
social security guidelines by the social security
administration or the department;
(B) Be entitled to receive supplemental
security income or be eligible for supplemental security
income-related programs;
(C) Be entitled to receive hospice services
in accordance with a voluntary election and a health care
provider statement of a terminal condition where:
(I) The applicant has received hospice
services or resided in a medical institution for not less
than thirty (30) consecutive days; or
(II) The applicant is not a
supplemental security income recipient and dies before
completion of the time requirement specified in subdivision
(I) of this subparagraph.
(D) Be qualified for services, pursuant to
rules of the department, under a Medicaid waiver or other
expansion that the legislature has authorized;
(E) Be infected with tuberculosis and, if
the person is not a Wyoming resident or United States
citizen, is present in Wyoming and, if not treated, is a
threat to infect Wyoming residents with tuberculosis;
(F) Be otherwise qualified for medical
assistance pursuant to federal Medicaid regulations or be
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0006
ENROLLED ACT NO. 12, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
eligible under a mandatory requirement of the federal
government for participation in Medicaid, provided that no
expansion eligibility for Medicaid beyond the eligibility
as of January 1, 2026 shall occur without prior
authorization by the legislature, except that the governor
may authorize a temporary expansion in eligibility needed
to combat a public health emergency, provided that the
temporary expansion shall end not more than thirty (30)
days after the adjournment of the next legislative session;
(G) Be a child in the custody of the
department of family services in foster care, basic foster
care, noncitizen foster care, subsidized adoption or in
residence at the Wyoming boys' school or the Wyoming girls'
school;
(H) Be enrolled in the 1115 family planning
waiver. The department of health is authorized to continue
operating the 1115 waiver until its planned expiration in
December 31, 2027 and is not authorized to renew the waiver
beyond this expiration date;
(J) Be enrolled in the employed individuals
with disabilities program under section
1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XV) of the federal Social Security Act;
(K) Be enrolled in the breast and cervical
cancer treatment program under section
1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XVIII) of the federal Social Security
Act.
(iv) An applicant shall fulfill any other
criteria required pursuant to rules of the department or
federal Medicaid regulations.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0006
ENROLLED ACT NO. 12, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. The department of health shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act not later than
October 1, 2026.
Section 3. This act applies to applications for
medical assistance submitted or renewed on or after July 1,
2027.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0006
ENROLLED ACT NO. 12, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2027.
(b) Sections 2 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
5